Missouri, session 2026, HB3114.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 60.590, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 60.590, to read as follows:
60.590. 1. On request of the department of agriculture or the state land surveyor, all
city and county recorders of deeds, together with all departments, boards or agencies of state
government, county, or city government, shall furnish to the department of agriculture or the
state land surveyor certified copies of desired records which are in their custody. This service
shall be free of cost when possible; otherwise, it shall be at actual cost of reproduction of the
records. On the same basis of cost, the department of agriculture shall furnish records within
its custody to other agencies or departments of state, county or city, certifying them.
2. All railroads operating in the state of Missouri shall provide digital copies of
station and valuation maps, including both active and abandoned rail, to the state land
surveyor. The state land surveyor shall retain these records in the same manner as
other records.
3. The department of agriculture may produce, reproduce and sell maps, plats,
reports, studies, and records, and the commission shall recommend to the department of
agriculture the charges therefor. All income received shall be promptly deposited in the state
treasury to the credit of the department of agriculture land survey revolving services fund.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.